Utah statutes.
35A-4-106.   Reciprocal arrangements with other jurisdictions.
(1)  The division is authorized to enter into reciprocal arrangements with
appropriate and authorized agencies of other states or of the federal
government, or both, in accordance with Subsections (1)(a) through (d):
(a)  Services performed by an individual for a single employing unit for which
services are customarily performed in more than one state shall be considered
to be services performed entirely within any one of the states:
(i)  in which any part of the individual's service is performed;
(ii)  in which the individual has the individual's residence; or
(iii)  in which the employing unit maintains a place of business, if there is
in effect, as to such services, an election, approved by the agency charged
with the administration of such state's unemployment compensation law,
pursuant to which all the services performed by the individual for the
employing unit are considered to be performed entirely within the state.
(b)  The division shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of
benefits on the basis of combining an individual's wages and employment
covered under this chapter with the individual's wages and employment covered
under the unemployment compensation laws of other states that:
(i)  are approved by the Secretary of Labor in consultation with the state
unemployment compensation agencies as reasonably calculated to assure the
prompt and full payment of compensation in such situations; and
(ii)  include provisions for:
(A)  applying the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the
combining of an individual's wages and employment covered under two or more
state unemployment compensation laws; and
(B)  avoiding the duplicate use of wages and employment by reason of such
combining.
(c) (i)  Wages or services, upon the basis of which an individual may become
entitled to benefits under an unemployment compensation law of another state
or of the federal government, shall be considered to be wages for insured work
for the purpose of determining the individual's rights to benefits under this
chapter.
(ii)  Wages for insured work, on the basis of which an individual may become
entitled to benefits under this chapter shall be considered to be wages or
services on the basis of which unemployment compensation under the law of
another state or of the federal government is payable.
(iii)  An arrangement may not be entered into unless it contains provisions
for reimbursements:
(A)  to the fund for the benefits paid under this chapter upon the basis of
such wages or services; and
(B)  from the fund for such of the compensation paid under the other law upon
the basis of wages for insured work, as the director of the division finds
will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests.
(d) (i)  Contributions due under this chapter with respect to wages for
insured work shall, for the purposes of Section 35A-4-305, be considered to
have been paid to the fund as of the date payment was made as contributions
therefor under another state or Federal Unemployment Compensation Law.
(ii) An arrangement may not be entered into unless it contains provisions for
the reimbursement to the fund of the contributions and the actual earnings
thereon as the director of the division finds will be fair and reasonable as
to all affected interests.
(2) (a)  Reimbursement paid from the fund pursuant to Subsection (1)(c) shall
be considered to be benefits for the purpose of Sections 35A-4-401 and
35A-4-501.
(b)  The division is authorized to make to other state or federal agencies and
to receive from other state or federal agencies reimbursements from or to the
fund in accordance with arrangements entered into pursuant to Subsection (1).
(3) (a)  The administration of this chapter and of other state and federal
unemployment compensation and public employment service laws will be promoted
by cooperation between this state and the other states and the appropriate
federal agencies in exchanging services, and making available facilities and
information.
(b)  The division is authorized to make investigations, secure and transmit
information, make available services and facilities, and exercise other powers
provided in this chapter with respect to the administration of this chapter as
it considers necessary or appropriate to facilitate the administration of any
unemployment compensation or public employment service law, and in like
manner, to accept and use information, services and facilities made available
to this state by the agency charged with the administration of any other
unemployment compensation or public employment service law.
(4)  To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of the United
States, the director of the division is authorized to enter into or cooperate
in arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under this chapter
and facilities and services provided under the unemployment compensation law
of any foreign government, may be utilized for the taking of claims and the
payment of benefits under this chapter or under a similar law of the foreign
government.
